Washington statutes.
RCW 7.75.010

Legislative findings and intent.

(1) The legislature finds and declares that:

(a) The resolution of many disputes can be costly and complex in a judicial setting where the parties involved are necessarily in an adversary posture and subject to formalized procedures; and

(b) Alternative dispute resolution centers can meet the needs of Washington's citizens by providing forums in which persons may voluntarily participate in the resolution of disputes in an informal and less adversarial atmosphere.

(2) It is the intent of the legislature that programs established pursuant to this chapter:

(a) Stimulate the establishment and use of dispute resolution centers to help meet the need for alternatives to the courts for the resolution of certain disputes.

(b) Encourage continuing community participation in the development, administration, and oversight of local programs designed to facilitate the informal resolution of disputes between and among members of the community.

(c) Offer structures for dispute resolution which may serve as models for resolution centers in other communities.

(d) Serve a specific community or locale and resolve disputes that arise within that community or locale.

(e) Educate the community on ways of using the services of the neighborhood dispute resolution center directly and in a preventive capacity.

[ 1984 c 258 s 501.]

NOTES:

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.